Connecticut, session 2026, HB05073.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That additional funds be appropriated to the Office of Policy and
Management, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for grants to municipalities to assist with mitigating increased
costs to municipalities in administering early voting.